Utah statutes.
9-7-409.   Entities may cooperate, merge, or consolidate in providing library services.

Boards of directors of city libraries, boards of directors of county libraries, boards of education, governing boards of other educational institutions, library agencies, and local political subdivisions may cooperate, merge, or consolidate in providing library services.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

